Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3529.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CONTINUING APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriations. new text end new text begin (a) If a bill to fund the operations of a state agency for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, has not been enacted by that date, amounts sufficient to continue operation of that agency and the programs administered by that agency through July 31, 2025, are appropriated to the agency from the appropriate funds and accounts in the state treasury at the lower of the following levels: new text end new text begin (1) the base level for that period for that agency, as determined and adjusted according to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.11, subdivision 3, and previous appropriation acts; or new text end new text begin (2) total fiscal year 2025 appropriations to that agency, divided by 12. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this section, the amount of an appropriation for the period provided in paragraph (a), clause (1), equals the base for that appropriation in fiscal year 2026 as estimated in the forecast of revenues and expenditures, under Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.103, released on March 6, 2025, divided by 12. The base level for an appropriation that was designated as onetime or was onetime in nature is zero. new text end new text begin (c) For the purposes of this section, "state agency" means an entity in the executive, judicial, or legislative branch of state government. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Legislative Advisory Commission. new text end new text begin The appropriations under subdivision 1 must not be reduced, except as required to balance expenditures with revenue and after consultation with the Legislative Advisory Commission as required by Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.152, subdivision 4. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end